Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Construction and Operation of Lines, Plants, or Systems Generally

46-5-40.
“Person” defined.

As used in this part, the term “person” means:

Any corporation, company, firm, association, or individual owning, leasing, or operating a public telephone service or telephone line in this state; and

Any cooperative nonprofit membership corporation or limited dividend or mutual association, with respect to that part or portion of its operations devoted to the furnishing of telephone service within this state.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 8.

46-5-41.
Obtaining of certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction, operation, acquisition, or extension of telephone lines, plants, or systems.

No person shall construct or operate any telephone line, plant, or system or any extension thereof or acquire ownership or control thereof, either directly or indirectly, without first obtaining from the Public Service Commission a certificate that the present or future public convenience and necessity require or will require such construction, operation, or acquisition.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 1; Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 9/HB 1115.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “No” for “Except as provided in Code Section 46-5-46, no” in the beginning of this Code section.

46-5-42.
Interference with existing telephone lines, plants, or systems by person constructing or extending a telephone line, plant, or system.

If any person, in constructing or extending his telephone line, plant, or system, unreasonably interferes or is about to interfere unreasonably with any line, plant, system, or service of any other person, the commission, on its own initiative or on the complaint of any person claiming to be injuriously affected, may, after a hearing conducted after the giving of reasonable notice, make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions with respect thereto as are just and reasonable.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 2.

46-5-43.
Prescription by commission of rules and regulations as to application for certificate of public convenience and necessity; giving notice of receipt of application.

The application for any certificate of public convenience and necessity provided for in Code Section 46-5-41 shall be made under such rules and regulations as the commission may from time to time prescribe. Upon the receipt of any such application for such certificate, the commission shall cause notice thereof to be given by mail or by personal service to the chief executive officer of the municipalities affected, if any, and to any person occupying the territory affected, and shall publish such notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in each territory affected.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 3.

46-5-44.
Power of commission to issue or deny certificate.

The commission shall have power, after a hearing, either to issue the certificate of public convenience and necessity as prayed for, to refuse to issue the same, or to issue it for the construction, operation, or acquisition of only a portion of the contemplated line, plant, or system or extension thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 4.

46-5-45.
Filing complaints with commission regarding persons constructing, operating, or acquiring telephone line, plant, or
system without certificate.

Whenever any person is engaged in or is about to engage in the construction, operation, or acquisition of any telephone line, plant, or system without having secured a certificate of public convenience and necessity as required by Code Section 46-5-41, any interested person may file a complaint with the commission. The commission may, with or without notice, make its order requiring the person complained of to cease and desist from such construction, operation, or acquisition until the commission makes and files its decision on the complaint or until the further order of the commission. The commission may, after a hearing conducted after the giving of reasonable notice, make such order and prescribe such terms and conditions with respect thereto as are just and reasonable.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, § 6.

46-5-46.
[Repealed] Granting of certificates to persons engaged in construction or operation of telephone line, plant, or system as of February 17, 1950.

History.

Ga. L. 1950, p. 311, §§ 1, 5; repealed by Ga. L. 2012, p. 847, § 10/HB 1115, effective July 1, 2012.